Illinois, session 104th, HB1062.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Century Network Act is amended by 5adding Section 8 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3921/8 new)7    Sec. 8. Anchor institutions; priorities for connection. 8The connection of anchor institutions to the Illinois Century 9Network shall be prioritized as follows:10        (1) the first priority is the connection of anchor 11    institutions that could be connected using the Illinois 12    Century Network's existing middle-mile network within 5 13    miles of the existing network;14        (2) the second priority is the connection of anchor 15    institutions that could be connected using the Illinois 16    Century Network's existing middle-mile network within 10 17    miles of the existing network;18        (3) the third priority is the connection of anchor 19    institutions that could be connected using the Illinois 20    Century Network's existing middle-mile network farther 21    than 10 miles from the existing network, and that are 22    eligible for E-rate, as described under 47 CFR 54, Subpart 23    F, at 60% and higher;  HB1062 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 02979 BDA 12996 b1        (4) the fourth priority is the connection of anchor 2    institutions that need expanded middle-mile Illinois 3    Century Network infrastructure; and4        (5) the fifth priority is the connection of anchor 5    institutions that need expanded last-mile infrastructure.